Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202185-2903
Eligible military student; eligible veteran student; enrollment; automatic acceptance.

(1) Each public postsecondary institution in this state shall, upon application, automatically accept any eligible military student or eligible veteran student who otherwise meets the admissions requirements for such postsecondary institution to enroll as an undergraduate student in virtual and in-person courses and programs.

(2) Except with regard to the acceptance of eligible military students and eligible veteran students as provided in subsection (1) of this section, nothing in the Veteran Promise Act shall be construed to change any policy or practice of any public postsecondary institution in this state, including any additional criteria or prioritization for capped enrollment academic programs.

Laws 2021, LB669, § 3.
May 22, 2021